Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.010

Employment of road engineer.

The county legislative authority of each county shall employ a county road engineer on either a full-time or part-time basis, or may contract with another county for the engineering services of a county road engineer from such other county.

[ 2002 c 9 s 1; 1997 c 147 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 85; 1984 c 11 s 1; 1980 c 93 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.010. Prior: 1943 c 73 s 1, part; 1937 c 187 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-4, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.